South Dakota, session 2026, HB1089.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 10-39-54 be AMENDED:
10-39-54. All taxes, interest and penalties imposed and collected by the secretary
of revenue under this chapter must be distributed as follows:
(1) For persons severing precious metals that were in business in the state prior to
January 1, 1981, all revenues collected must be deposited in the state treasury
and credited to the general fund;
(2) For persons permitted on or after January 1, 1981, but before July 1, 2026, for the
purpose of severing precious metals, eighty percent of the revenues collected must
be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the general fund, while the
remaining twenty percent must be remitted by the secretary of the department to
the treasurer of the county in which the precious metals were severed. When the
county has received a total of one million dollars attributable to any person subject
to the tax, all future revenues attributable to that person must be deposited in the
state treasury and credited to the general fund. No merger, consolidation or
acquisition of a person subject to §§ 10-39-54 to 10-39-54.4, inclusive, by another
such person, limits the share of revenue due to the county from the person; and
(3) For persons permitted on or after July 1, 2026, for the purpose of severing precious
metals, eighty percent of the revenues collected must be deposited in the state
treasury and credited to the general fund, while the remaining twenty percent must
be remitted by the secretary of the department to the treasurer of the county in
which the precious metals were severed. No merger, consolidation or acquisition
of a person subject to §§ 10-39-54 to 10-39-54.4, inclusive, by another such
person limits the share of revenue due to the county from the person.

26.575.13 2 1089
Any revenues attributed to the severance of precious metals from lands owned or
controlled by this state must be deposited in the common school permanent fund.
Section 2. That § 10-39-54.1 be AMENDED:
10-39-54.1. The secretary of the department shall transfer, by the end of the
calendar month following each reporting period, the revenue payable to a county pursuant
to subdivisions 10-39-54(2) and (3).
HB1089 ENROLLED

26.575.13 3 1089
An Act to modify the distributions of revenues collected from severance taxation on new
permits.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1089
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1089 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1089 ENROLLED